Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-223
Residential energy conservation loan program, defined.

Residential energy conservation loan program shall mean a system by which loans and mortgage loans for residential energy conservation devices are made to low-income and moderate-income persons pursuant to the Nebraska Investment Finance Authority Act.

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 23;

Laws 1991, LB 253, § 26.